test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lomanj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - ломань: # Ordinary nouns 'person/ henkilö' - full paradigm including MWN
     ломань+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: ломань
     ломань+N+SP+Gen+Indef: ломанень
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+Indef: ломаньда
     ломань+N+SP+Dat+Indef: ломаненди
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+Indef: ломаньфтома
     ломань+N+SP+Comp+Indef: ломаньшка
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+Indef: ломаньца
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+Indef: ломаньцта
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+Indef: ломаньц
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+Indef: ломаньгя
     ломань+N+SP+Tra+Indef: ломанькс
     ломань+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: ломанезе
     ломань+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: ломанене
     ломань+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: ломанезень
     ломань+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: ломаньнень
     ломань+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [ломанезти, ломанезенди]
     ломань+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: ломаньненди
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1: ломаньдон
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1: ломаньфтомон
     ломань+N+SP+Comp+PxSg1: ломаньшкан
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1: ломаньцон
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1: ломаньцтон
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1: ломанезон
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1: ломаньгян
     ломань+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ломаньце
     ломань+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: ломаньхне
     ломань+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: ломаньцень
     ломань+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: ломаньхнень
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2: ломаньдот
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2: ломаньфтомот
     ломань+N+SP+Comp+PxSg2: ломаньшкат
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2: ломаньцот
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2: ломаньцтот
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: ломанезот
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2: ломаньгят
     ломань+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ломаньц
     ломань+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: ломаненза
     ломань+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: ломаненц
     ломань+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: ломанензон
     ломань+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: ломаненцты
     ломань+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: ломанензонды
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3: ломаньдонза
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3: ломаньфтомонза
     ломань+N+SP+Comp+PxSg3: ломаньшканза
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3: ломаньцонза
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3: ломаньцтонза
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3: ломаньзонза
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3: ломаньгянза
     ломань+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1: ломаненьке
     ломань+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1: ломаненьконь
     ломань+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1: ломаненьконди
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1: ломаньдонк
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1: ломаньфтомонк
     ломань+N+SP+Comp+PxPl1: ломаньшканк
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1: ломаньцонк
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1: ломаньцтонк
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1: ломаньзонк
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1: ломаньгянк
     ломань+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2: ломаненте
     ломань+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2: ломанентень
     ломань+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2: ломанентенди
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2: ломаньдонт
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2: ломаньфтомонт
     ломань+N+SP+Comp+PxPl2: ломаньшкант
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2: ломаньцонт
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2: ломаньцтонт
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2: ломанезонт
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2: ломаньгянт
     ломань+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3: ломаньцна
     ломань+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3: ломаньцнон
     ломань+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3: ломаньцнонды
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3: ломаньдост
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3: ломаньфтомост
     ломань+N+SP+Comp+PxPl3: ломаньшкаст
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3: ломаньцост
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3: ломаньцтост
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3: ломанезост
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3: ломаньгяст
     ломань+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: ломатть
     ломань+N+Sg+Nom+Def: ломаньць
     ломань+N+Sg+Gen+Def: ломаньть
     ломань+N+Sg+Dat+Def: [ломаньти, ломаненди]
     ломань+N+Pl+Nom+Def: ломаттне
     ломань+N+Pl+Gen+Def: ломаттень
     ломань+N+Pl+Dat+Def: ломаттенди
     ломань+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок: ломаневок
     ломань+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Foc/вок: ломаненьвок
     #ломань+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Foc/гЕ: ломаненьге 
     #сон+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom+Foc/гЕ: сонга 
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+Indef+Foc/вок: ломаньдовок
     ломань+N+SP+Dat+Indef+Foc/вок: ломаненьдивок
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+Indef+Foc/вок: ломаньфтомовок
     ломань+N+SP+Comp+Indef+Foc/вок: ломаньшкавок
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+Indef+Foc/вок: ломаньцовок
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+Indef+Foc/вок: ломаньцтовок
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+Indef+Foc/вок: ломаньцка
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+Indef+Foc/вок: ломаньгявок
     ломань+N+SP+Tra+Indef+Foc/вок: ломанькска
     ломань+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ломанезевок
     ломань+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ломаненевок
     ломань+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ломанезеньге
     ломань+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ломанененьге
     ломань+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+Foc/вок: [ломанезтивок, ломанезендивок]
     ломань+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ломаненендивок
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ломаньдонга
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ломаньфтомонга
     ломань+N+SP+Comp+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ломаньшканка
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ломаньцонга
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ломаньцтонга
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ломанезонга
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ломаньгянга
     ломань+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/вок: ломаньцевок
     ломань+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/вок: ломаттевок
     ломань+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/вок: ломаньценьге
     ломань+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/вок: ломаттеньге
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2+Foc/вок: ломаньдотка
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2+Foc/вок: ломаньфтомотка
     ломань+N+SP+Comp+PxSg2+Foc/вок: ломаньшкатка
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2+Foc/вок: ломаньцотка
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2+Foc/вок: ломаньцтотка
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2+Foc/вок: ломанезотка
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2+Foc/вок: ломаньгятка
     ломань+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ломаньцевок
     ломань+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ломанензовок
     ломань+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ломаненцка
     ломань+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ломанензонга
     ломань+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ломаненцтывок
     ломань+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ломанензондывок
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ломаньдонзовок
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ломаньфтомонзовок
     ломань+N+SP+Comp+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ломаньшканзовок
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ломаньцонзовок
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ломаньцтонзовок
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ломаньзонзовок
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ломаньгянзовок
     ломань+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1+Foc/вок: ломаненькевок
     ломань+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1+Foc/вок: ломаненьконьге
     ломань+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1+Foc/вок: ломаненькондивок
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1+Foc/вок: ломаньдонковок
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1+Foc/вок: ломаньфтомонковок
     ломань+N+SP+Comp+PxPl1+Foc/вок: ломаньшканковок
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1+Foc/вок: ломаньцонковок
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1+Foc/вок: ломаньцтонковок
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1+Foc/вок: ломаньзонковок
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1+Foc/вок: ломаньгянковок
     ломань+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2+Foc/вок: ломанентевок
     ломань+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2+Foc/вок: ломанентеньге
     ломань+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2+Foc/вок: ломанентендивок
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2+Foc/вок: ломаньдонтка
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2+Foc/вок: ломаньфтомонтовок
     ломань+N+SP+Comp+PxPl2+Foc/вок: ломаньшкантовок
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2+Foc/вок: ломаньцонтка
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2+Foc/вок: ломаньцтонтка
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2+Foc/вок: ломанезонтка
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2+Foc/вок: ломаньгянтка
     ломань+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3+Foc/вок: ломаньцновок
     ломань+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3+Foc/вок: ломаньцнонга
     ломань+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3+Foc/вок: ломаньцнондывок
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3+Foc/вок: ломаньдостка
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3+Foc/вок: ломаньфтомостка
     ломань+N+SP+Comp+PxPl3+Foc/вок: ломаньшкастка
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3+Foc/вок: ломаньцостка
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3+Foc/вок: ломаньцтостка
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3+Foc/вок: ломанезостка
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3+Foc/вок: ломаньгястка
     ломань+N+Pl+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок: ломаньхтка
     ломань+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Foc/вок: ломаньцьке
     ломань+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Foc/вок: ломаньтьке
     ломань+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Foc/вок: [ломаньтивок, ломаненьдивок]
     ломань+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Foc/вок: ломаттевок
     ломань+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Foc/вок: ломаттеньге
     ломань+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Foc/вок: ломаттендивок
